District of Columbia statutes.
10-1602.01

Findings.

The Council finds that it is appropriate that the District of Columbia seek to utilize the economic benefits that will be derived from the construction of the ballpark for the benefit and well-being of the residents of the District.

Apr. 8, 2005, D.C. Law 15-320, § 201, 52 DCR 1757

History